Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-215
Fees; quarterly payment into General Fund; transcripts for Supreme Court of United States; powers and duties of clerk.

The Clerk of the Supreme Court shall, on the first day in January, April, July, and October of each year, pay into the General Fund of the state treasury all fees of every nature and description received by him or her during the preceding three months; and the State Treasurer shall issue his or her receipt for such fees. If the clerk shall find it necessary to procure additional clerical help in preparing transcripts for use in the Supreme Court of the United States, he or she is authorized to pay for such additional help out of the fees collected for preparing such transcripts, taking proper receipts therefor; and he or she shall account for the balance of such fees as hereinbefore provided.

Laws 1909, c. 39, § 2, p. 224;

R.S.1913, § 1151;

Laws 1921, c. 213, § 3, p. 753;

C.S.1922, § 1080;

C.S.1929, § 27-215;

R.S.1943, § 24-215;

Laws 1981, LB 545, § 5.